Colorado statutes. TITLE 17 Corrections
ARTICLE 27.5
INTENSIVE SUPERVISION PROGRAMS

17-27.5-101. Authority to establish intensive supervision programs for parolees and community corrections offenders.

The department shall have the authority to establish and directly operate an intensive supervision program for any offender not having more than one hundred eighty days remaining until such offender's parole eligibility date and for any offender who successfully completes a regimented inmate discipline program pursuant to article 27.7 of this title.

The department shall also be authorized to refer for placement to an intensive supervision program operated under the jurisdiction of units of local government under contract with and approved by the department:

Any offender not having more than one hundred eighty days remaining until such offender's parole eligibility date and any offender who successfully completes a regimented inmate discipline program pursuant to article 27.7 of this title;

Any offender who has met program objectives of a residential community corrections program and who has not more than one hundred eighty days remaining until such offender's parole eligibility date.

The department shall have the authority to contract with community corrections programs and other providers for intensive supervision services subject to the approval of the affected unit of local government. In contracting for such programs, the department shall obtain the advice and consent of affected units of local government and shall consider the needs of the communities and offenders for successful reintegration into communities and the appropriate allocation of resources for effective correction of offenders.

The department may place in an intensive supervision program authorized pursuant to subsection (1) of this section any offender who has been referred to a community corrections program pursuant to section 18-1.3-301 (2)(b), C.R.S., and approved for placement in the program pursuant to section 17-27-103 (5) or section 17-27-104 (3) if the placement will not increase the overall vacancy rate as of June 30, 1995, for the community corrections program.

Source:

L. 86:

Entire article RC&RE, p. 764, § 6, effective May 28.

L. 89:

Entire section R&RE, p. 883, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 342, § 2, effective June 1.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 44, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 1276, § 14, effective June 5.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 842, § 1, effective May 23.

L. 98:

(1)(a) and (1)(b)(I) amended, p. 319, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2) amended, p. 1508, § 171, effective October 1.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

17-27.5-102. Minimum standards and criteria for the operation of intensive supervision programs.

The department shall have the power to establish and enforce standards and criteria for administration of intensive supervision programs.

The standards and criteria shall require that offenders in the program receive at least the minimum services consistent with public safety, including highly restricted activities, weekly face-to-face contact between the offender and the program staff, daily telephone contact between the offender and the program staff, a monitored curfew at the offender's place of residence at least once a month, employment visitation and monitoring at least twice each month, home visitation, drug and alcohol screening, treatment referrals and monitoring, assuring the payment of restitution, and community service in a manner that shall minimize any risk to the public.

An offender as defined in section 17-27-102 (6) is eligible for an intensive supervision program only upon the recommendation of the department if such offender has not more than one hundred eighty days remaining until such offender's parole eligibility date or upon a transfer from a community corrections residential program under article 27 of this title if such offender has not more than one hundred eighty days remaining until such offender's parole eligibility date and if the local community corrections board finds that the correctional needs of such offender will be better served by such supervision. The local community corrections board has the authority to accept, reject, or reject after acceptance the participation of any offender in each and every intensive supervision program under this article. In selecting offenders for transfer to an intensive supervision program, the department and the local community corrections board shall consider, but shall not be limited to, the following factors:

The frequency, severity, and recency of disciplinary actions against the offender;

The offender's escape history, if any;

Whether the offender has functioned at a high level of responsibility in a community corrections program, if applicable;

Whether the offender will have adequate means of support and suitable housing in the community; and

The nature of the offense for which the offender has been incarcerated.

At least two weeks prior to placement of a nonparoled offender in an intensive supervision program, the executive director shall notify or cause to be notified the respective prosecuting attorney and the law enforcement agency of the affected unit of local government; and he shall have previously notified the affected corrections board.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 884, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 91:

IP(3) amended, p. 342, § 3, effective June 1.

L. 93:

IP(3) amended, p. 44, § 2, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 719, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 843, § 2, effective May 23.

Editor's note:

Amendments to subsection (3) in House Bill 93-1073 and House Bill 93-1233 were harmonized.

17-27.5-103. Confinement in county jail.

Where the community corrections administrator of an intensive supervision program has cause to believe that an offender placed in the program has violated any rule or condition of his or her placement or cannot be safely supervised in that program, the administrator shall certify to the supervising community parole officer the facts that are the basis for his or her belief and execute a transfer order to the sheriff of the county in which the program is being operated, who shall confine the offender in the county jail pending a determination by the supervising community parole officer as to whether or not the offender shall remain in the program.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 884, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 659, § 12, effective April 25.

17-27.5-104. Escape from custody - duties of peace officer or community parole officer - definitions.

If an offender fails to remain within the extended limits on the offender's confinement as established under the intensive supervision program; or, having been ordered by the parole board, the executive director, or the administrator of the program to return to the correctional institution, neglects or fails to do so; or knowingly removes or tampers with an electronic monitoring device that the offender is required to wear as a condition of parole, the offender is deemed to have committed the offense of unauthorized absence and shall, upon conviction thereof, be punished as provided in section 18-8-208.2.

When a peace officer or community parole officer has probable cause to believe that an offender has committed unauthorized absence, as described in subsection (1) of this section and section 18-8-208.2, by knowingly removing or tampering with an electronic monitoring device that he or she is required to wear as a condition of parole, the officer shall immediately seek a warrant for the offender's arrest or effectuate an immediate arrest if the offender is in the presence of the officer; except that, before an officer arrests an offender pursuant to this subsection (2), the officer, if practicable, shall determine that the notification of removal or tampering was not merely the result of an equipment malfunction.

Subsequent to any arrest pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, if a peace officer or community parole officer has probable cause to believe that a person has committed the offense of unauthorized absence pursuant to this section, the peace officer or community parole officer shall submit charges to the office of the district attorney for consideration of filing pursuant to section 16-5-205.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Peace officer" means a certified peace officer described in section 16-2.5-102.

"Tampering" has the same meaning as set forth in section 17-1-102 (8.5).

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 885, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

Entire section amended, (SB 17-048), ch. 94, p. 286, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2021:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, (SB 21-146), ch. 459, p. 3085, § 9, effective July 6.

17-27.5-105. Duty to report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 885, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 843, § 3, effective May 23.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 729, § 14, effective May 18.

17-27.5-106. Authority of state board of parole to utilize intensive supervision programs.

An offender who is granted parole or whose parole is modified may be required by the state board of parole, as a condition of such parole, to participate in an intensive supervision program as defined by this article; except that the offender shall not be subject to the authority of the local community corrections board under section 17-27.5-102 (3).

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 885, § 2, effective July 1.